Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 18.50.900.
Prohibited acts and penalties.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both, who

without lawful authority and with the intent to deceive, makes, alters, amends, or mutilates a certificate of birth or certified copy of a certificate of birth with the intent that it may be used;

wilfully and knowingly uses or attempts to use, or furnishes to another for use, for the purpose of deception, a certificate of birth or certified copy of a record of birth so made, altered, amended, or mutilated;

with the intention to deceive wilfully uses or attempts to use a certificate of birth or certified copy of a record of birth knowing that the certificate or certified copy was issued upon a record that is false in whole or in part or that relates to the birth of another person; or

wilfully and knowingly furnishes a certificate of birth or certified copy of a record of birth with the intention that it be used by a person other than the person to whom the record of birth relates.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $300, or by imprisonment for not more than three months, or by both, except when a more severe penalty is provided for in this chapter, who

wilfully and knowingly makes a false statement in a report or certificate of birth required to be filed under this chapter or regulations adopted under it, or in an application for amendment of it, or in an affidavit or paper submitted in support of such a certificate or application, with intent to induce or secure the registration of a birth, or the acceptance of a certificate of birth as evidence of the date and place of birth, identity, or citizenship, or the amendment of a birth certificate for a purpose of deception; or

wilfully and knowingly falsifies, makes or alters a certificate or certified copy of a vital statistics record except as provided in this chapter or regulations adopted under it.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $100, except when a different penalty is provided for in this chapter, who

knowingly transports or accepts for transportation, interment, or other final disposition a dead body without the required permit issued in accordance with this chapter or regulations adopted under it;

refuses to provide information, or who knowingly furnishes false information, required by this chapter or regulations adopted under it; or

violates the provisions of this chapter or neglects or refuses to perform a duty imposed upon the person by this chapter or the regulations adopted under it.

History.

(§ 32 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

18.50.360

.
Renumbered in 1986.

Sec. 18.50.950.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“adoptive parent” means a person who has adopted another person under AS 25.23;

“biological parent” means a parent named on the original certificate of birth of an adopted person;

“bureau” means the Bureau of Vital Statistics;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“dead body” means a lifeless human body or parts or bones of it from the state of which it reasonably may be concluded that death recently occurred;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“fetal death” means death before the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, where

the death is indicated by the fact that, after expulsion or extraction, the fetus does not breathe or show evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles; and

the expulsion or extraction is not caused by an induced termination of pregnancy;

“filing” means the presentation of a certificate, report, or other record provided for in this chapter, of a birth, death, fetal death, adoption, marriage, or divorce for registration by the bureau;

“final disposition” means the burial, interment, cremation, or other disposition of a dead body or fetus;

“induced termination of pregnancy” means the purposeful interruption of an intrauterine pregnancy with the intention other than to produce a live-born infant, and that does not result in a live birth, except that “induced termination of pregnancy” does not include management of prolonged retention of products of conception following fetal death;

“institution” means a public or private establishment that provides in-patient medical, surgical, or diagnostic care or treatment, or nursing, custodial, or domiciliary care to two or more unrelated individuals, or to which persons are committed by law;

“live birth” means the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, that, after expulsion or extraction, breathes or shows evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not the umbilical cord has been cut or the placenta is attached;

“medical history” includes information relating to a person’s medical conditions and treatment, immunization records, and other medical information about the person that could be important to the health care of the adopted person;

“physician” means a person authorized or licensed to practice medicine under the laws of the state;

“registration” means the acceptance by the bureau and the incorporation in its official records of certificates, reports, or other records provided for in this chapter, of births, deaths, fetal deaths, adoptions, marriages, or divorces;

“state registrar” means the state registrar of vital statistics;

“system of vital statistics” includes the registration, collection, preservation, amendment, and certification of vital statistics records, and related activities including the tabulation, analysis, and publication of statistical data derived from them;

“vital statistics” means records of birth, death, fetal death, induced termination of pregnancy, marriage, divorce, adoption, and related data.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 140 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 124 SLA 1994; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 141 SLA 2002; am § 88 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 11 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 18.50.370.
Renumbered in 1986 and reorganized in 1986, 2002, and 2012 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Sec. 18.50.990.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Vital Statistics Act.

History.

(§ 33 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 18.50.380.
Renumbered in 1986.